Maryland, session 2025, HB1392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–903.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CANNABIS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(3) “PASSENGER AREA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 21–903 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1392*

HOUSE BILL 1392
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT SMOKE, VAPE, OR CONSUME CANNABIS IN THE
PASSENGER AREA OF A MOTOR VEHICLE IN WHICH A MINOR IS AN OCCUPANT.
(C) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.